Georgia, session 2025_26, HB795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 2A of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
Department of Public Health generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"31-2A-21.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
H. B. 795
- 1 -

LC 60 0110
(1) 'Department' means the Department of Public Health.
(2) 'Emergency' means a condition or set of circumstances demanding immediate
attention to prevent death or substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major
bodily function.
(3) 'Healthcare professional' means a physician, nurse, or other healthcare practitioner
licensed, registered, or certified by the state to provide healthcare services consistent with
his or her scope of practice.
(4) 'Healthcare services' means services for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure,
or relief of a physical health condition, illness, injury, or disease.
(5) 'Hotline service' means the Infant Wellness Resource hotline service established
pursuant to this Code section.
(6) 'Infant' means a child under three years of age.
(7) 'Telehealth' means the use of electronic information and telecommunications
technologies that include, at minimum, audio and video equipment permitting two-way,
real-time interactive communication to support and promote long-distance healthcare
services between a caller and a healthcare professional.
(b) Subject to available funding, the department shall establish and maintain, on a 24 hour
per day basis, an Infant Wellness Resource hotline service, which shall receive and respond
to calls from persons who are seeking help for an infant who is experiencing a health issue
or illness, in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section, and for any other purpose
provided for in this Code section.
(c) Upon receipt of a call, hotline service staff shall promptly identify whether the call is
an emergency. If hotline service staff deem that the call:
(1) Is not an emergency, such staff shall either refer or directly connect the caller to
appropriate state and local programs, healthcare services, healthcare professionals, and
other resources that can be accessed by the caller and used to address, mitigate, and
potentially eliminate the health issue or illness. Referrals and connections made pursuant
H. B. 795
- 2 -

LC 60 0110
to this paragraph may be facilitated through the use of telephone or digital
communications, including, but not limited to, text message, email, or online support
chat. Hotline service staff shall not provide direct healthcare services. Callers referred
for healthcare services under this paragraph shall be provided the opportunity to consult
with an authorized healthcare professional via telehealth within two business days; or
(2) Is an emergency, such staff shall immediately effectuate a warm hand-off of the
caller to staff at 9-1-1 emergency services. A warm hand-off performed under this
paragraph shall involve hotline service staff using teleconferencing technology to transfer
the call; remaining on the line and accessible to the caller during the transfer of the call;
formally introducing the caller to the staff member receiving the call at 9-1-1 emergency
services; and summarizing, for such receiving staff member, the information that
necessitated the transfer of the call. At no time during a warm hand-off conducted
pursuant to this paragraph shall a caller be placed on hold.
(d) The Department of Administrative Services shall, in coordination with the department,
select and contract with ten or more healthcare providers, as it deems necessary, to provide
healthcare services via telehealth pursuant to this Code section. All healthcare services
provided pursuant to such contracts shall be provided by healthcare professionals licensed
to provide such services under the laws of this state. The factors used to select such
healthcare professionals shall include, but shall not be limited to:
(1) A demonstrated ability to maximize payment for healthcare services from
commercial insurers and other third parties;
(2) The ability to provide healthcare services in a language fluently spoken by the callers
receiving such services;
(3) A demonstrated record of providing healthcare services via telehealth to infants;
(4) The ability to use information technology to track healthcare services provided and
outcomes for program evaluation purposes; and
H. B. 795
- 3 -

LC 60 0110
(5) A financial model that allows the healthcare professional to serve all callers,
regardless of whether such callers make a copayment or have third-party insurance
coverage.
(e) The department shall, subject to the availability of funding, develop, implement, and
disseminate materials and training, including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) Training programs and curricula to be used in training hotline service staff to
recognize and respond to an emergency; to identify the appropriate state and local
programs, healthcare services, healthcare professionals, and resources for callers; and to
use any technology related to carrying out the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code
section;
(2) Promotional materials to be placed in conspicuous places throughout the state in clear
view of the public where similar notices are customarily posted; and
(3) A description of the hotline service to be placed on the department's website.
(f)(1) In addition to the general administration of the hotline service, funds appropriated
for the hotline service may be expended for the following purposes:
(A) Reimbursing healthcare professionals for healthcare services provided to callers
who do not have coverage under government or private policies;
(B) Developing and implementing training as provided in subsection (e) of this Code
section; and
(C) Developing and disseminating promotional materials as provided in subsection (e)
of this Code section.
(2) Funds appropriated for the hotline service shall not be used to reimburse any person
for copayments required by a commercial insurance policy.
(g) Any person or persons participating in making referrals to callers or connecting callers
with state and local programs, healthcare services, healthcare professionals, and other
resources pursuant to this Code section or participating in any judicial proceeding or any
other proceeding resulting from such referrals or connections shall in so doing be immune
H. B. 795
- 4 -

LC 60 0110
from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed, provided
that such participation pursuant to this Code section or any other law is made in good faith.
(h) The department is authorized to adopt rules and regulations to implement the
100 provisions of this Code section."
101 SECTION 2.
102 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 795
- 5 -